North Dakota, session 69, SB2197.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 20.1-01-34 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
20.1-01-34. Crossbow legal weapon.
1. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, an individual may use a crossbow during
the duration of any deer gun season if the individual possesses the appropriate deer
gun license.
2. An individual over the age of seventy-five may use a crossbow during the duration of
any deer bow season if the individual possesses the appropriate deer bow license.
Page No. 1 25.0796.01000